Utah statutes.
53-7-104.   Enforcement of state fire code and rules -- Division of authority and responsibility.

(1)  The authority and responsibility for enforcing the state fire code and rules made under this chapter is divided as provided in this section.

(2)  The fire officers of any city or county shall enforce the state fire code and rules of the state fire marshal in their respective areas.

(3)  The state fire marshal may enforce the state fire code and rules in:

(a)  areas outside of corporate cities, fire protection districts, and other local districts or special service districts organized for fire protection purposes;

(b)  state-owned property, school district owned property, and privately owned property used for schools located within corporate cities and county fire protection districts, asylums, mental hospitals, hospitals, sanitariums, homes for the aged, residential health-care facilities, children's homes or institutions, or similar institutional type occupancy of any capacity; and

(c)  corporate cities, counties, fire protection districts, and special service districts organized for fire protection purposes upon receiving a request from the chief fire official or the local governing body.



Amended by Chapter 310, 2010 General Session

